customize_system/packages/guadalinex-openoffice2.1-conf/guadalinex-openoffice2.1-conf-0.1/gcs/conffiles_skel/opt/openoffice.org2.1/share/dict/ooo/es_ES.aff
SFX W   eguir iguiera     eguir
SFX W   enchir inchiese    enchir
SFX W   enchir inchiera    enchir
SFX W   endir indiese     endir
SFX W   endir indiera     endir
SFX W   enir  iniese      enir
SFX W   enir  iniera      enir
SFX W   entir intiera     entir
SFX W   entir intiese     entir
SFX W   erir  iriera      erir
SFX W   erir  iriese      erir
SFX W   r     ese         ernir
SFX W   r     era         ernir
SFX W   ertir irtiera     ertir
SFX W   ertir irtiese     ertir
SFX W   ervir irviera     ervir
SFX W   ervir irviese     ervir
SFX W   estir istiera     estir
SFX W   estir istiese     estir
SFX W   r     ese         eunir
SFX W   r     era         eunir
SFX W   etir  itiera      etir
SFX W   etir  itiese      etir
SFX W   irir  iriera      irir
SFX W   irir  iriese      irir
SFX W   r     ese         ohibir
SFX W   r     era         ohibir
SFX W   ír    yera        oír
SFX W   ír    yese        oír
SFX W   orir  uriera      orir
SFX W   orir  uriese      orir
SFX W   ormir urmiera     ormir
SFX W   ormir urmiese     ormir
SFX W   cir   jera        ducir
SFX W   cir   jese        ducir
SFX W   r     era         [^d]ucir
SFX W   r     ese         [^d]ucir
SFX W   ir    yera        [^g]uir
SFX W   ir    yese        [^g]uir
SFX W   üir   uyese       güir
SFX W   üir   uyera       güir
SFX W   ir    era         ullir
SFX W   ir    ese         ullir
SFX W   ir    era         uñir
SFX W   ir    ese         uñir
SFX W   ar    uvieses     andar
SFX W   ar    uvieras     andar
SFX W   r     ses         [^a]ndar
SFX W   r     ras         [^a]ndar
SFX W   r     ses         [^n]dar
SFX W   r     ras         [^n]dar
SFX W   r     ses         [^d]ar
SFX W   r     ras         [^d]ar
SFX W   aber  upieras     aber
SFX W   aber  upieses     aber
SFX W   er    ieras       [^fh]acer
SFX W   er    ieses       [^fh]acer
SFX W   acer  icieras     [fh]acer
SFX W   acer  icieses     [fh]acer
SFX W   er    ieras       aler
SFX W   er    ieses       aler
SFX W   er    yeses       caer
SFX W   er    yeras       caer
SFX W   er    ieras       e[cd]er
SFX W   er    ieses       e[cd]er
SFX W   er    yeras       [eo]er
SFX W   er    yeses       [eo]er
SFX W   er    ieras       ender
SFX W   er    ieses       ender
SFX W   ener  uvieras     ener
SFX W   ener  uvieses     ener
SFX W   er    ieras       er[dnt]er
SFX W   er    ieses       er[dnt]er
SFX W   erer  isieras     erer
SFX W   erer  isieses     erer
SFX W   er    ieras       o[clv]er
SFX W   er    ieses       o[clv]er
SFX W   oder  udieras     oder
SFX W   oder  udieses     oder
SFX W   er    ieras       olver
SFX W   er    ieses       olver
SFX W   oner  usieras     oner
SFX W   oner  usieses     oner
SFX W   er    ieras       or[cd]er
SFX W   er    ieses       or[cd]er
SFX W   er    jeses       raer
SFX W   er    jeras       raer
SFX W   r     eras        alir
SFX W   r     eses        alir
SFX W   ebir  ibieses     ebir
SFX W   ebir  ibieras     ebir
SFX W   ecir  ijeses      ecir
SFX W   ecir  ijeras      ecir
SFX W   edir  idieses     edir
SFX W   edir  idieras     edir
SFX W   egir  igieses     egir
SFX W   egir  igieras     egir
SFX W   emir  imieses     emir
SFX W   emir  imieras     emir
SFX W   eír   ieses       eír
SFX W   eír   ieras       eír
SFX W   eñir  iñeses      eñir
SFX W   eñir  iñeras      eñir
SFX W   eguir iguieses    eguir
SFX W   eguir iguieras    eguir
SFX W   enchir inchieses   enchir
SFX W   enchir inchieras   enchir
SFX W   endir indieses    endir
SFX W   endir indieras    endir
SFX W   enir  inieses     enir
SFX W   enir  inieras     enir
SFX W   entir intieras    entir
SFX W   entir intieses    entir
SFX W   erir  irieras     erir
SFX W   erir  irieses     erir
SFX W   r     eses        ernir
SFX W   r     eras        ernir
SFX W   ertir irtieras    ertir
SFX W   ertir irtieses    ertir
SFX W   ervir irvieras    ervir
SFX W   ervir irvieses    ervir
SFX W   estir istieras    estir
SFX W   estir istieses    estir
SFX W   r     eses        eunir
SFX W   r     eras        eunir
SFX W   etir  itieras     etir
SFX W   etir  itieses     etir
SFX W   irir  irieras     irir
SFX W   irir  irieses     irir
SFX W   r     eses        ohibir
SFX W   r     eras        ohibir
SFX W   ír    yeras       oír
SFX W   ír    yeses       oír
SFX W   orir  urieras     orir
SFX W   orir  urieses     orir
SFX W   ormir urmieras    ormir
SFX W   ormir urmieses    ormir
SFX W   cir   jeras       ducir
SFX W   cir   jeses       ducir
SFX W   r     eras        [^d]ucir
SFX W   r     eses        [^d]ucir
SFX W   ir    yeras       [^g]uir
SFX W   ir    yeses       [^g]uir
SFX W   üir   uyeses      güir
SFX W   üir   uyeras      güir
SFX W   ir    eras        ullir
SFX W   ir    eses        ullir
SFX W   ir    eras        uñir
SFX W   ir    eses        uñir
SFX W   ar    uviésemos   andar
SFX W   ar    uviéramos   andar
SFX W   r     ásemos      [^a]ndar
SFX W   ar    áramos      [^a]ndar
SFX W   ar    ásemos      [^n]dar
SFX W   ar    áramos      [^n]dar
SFX W   ar    ásemos      [^d]ar
SFX W   ar    áramos      [^d]ar
SFX W   aber  upiéramos   aber
SFX W   aber  upiésemos   aber
SFX W   er    iésemos     [^fh]acer
SFX W   er    iéramos     [^fh]acer
SFX W   acer  iciéramos   [fh]acer
SFX W   acer  iciésemos   [fh]acer
SFX W   er    iésemos     aler
SFX W   er    iéramos     aler
SFX W   er    yésemos     caer
SFX W   er    yéramos     caer
SFX W   er    iésemos     e[cd]er
SFX W   er    iéramos     e[cd]er
SFX W   er    yésemos     [eo]er
SFX W   er    yéramos     [eo]er
SFX W   er    iésemos     ender
SFX W   er    iéramos     ender
SFX W   ener  uviésemos   ener
SFX W   ener  uviéramos   ener
SFX W   er    iéramos     er[dnt]er
SFX W   er    iésemos     er[dnt]er
SFX W   erer  isiésemos   erer
SFX W   erer  isiéramos   erer
SFX W   er    iéramos     o[clv]er
SFX W   er    iésemos     o[clv]er
SFX W   oder  udiéramos   oder
SFX W   oder  udiésemos   oder
SFX W   er    iéramos     olver
SFX W   er    iésemos     olver
SFX W   oner  usiésemos   oner
SFX W   oner  usiéramos   oner
SFX W   er    iéramos     or[cd]er
SFX W   er    iésemos     or[cd]er
SFX W   er    jésemos     raer
SFX W   er    jéramos     raer
SFX W   r     ésemos      alir
SFX W   r     éramos      alir
SFX W   ebir  ibiésemos   ebir
SFX W   ebir  ibiéramos   ebir
SFX W   ecir  ijésemos    ecir
SFX W   ecir  ijéramos    ecir
SFX W   edir  idiésemos   edir
SFX W   edir  idiéramos   edir
SFX W   egir  igiésemos   egir
SFX W   egir  igiéramos   egir
SFX W   emir  imiésemos   emir
SFX W   emir  imiéramos   emir
SFX W   eír   iésemos     eír
SFX W   eír   iéramos     eír
SFX W   eñir  iñésemos    eñir
SFX W   eñir  iñéramos    eñir
SFX W   eguir iguiésemos  eguir
SFX W   eguir iguiéramos  eguir
SFX W   enchir inchiéramos enchir
SFX W   enchir inchiésemos enchir
SFX W   endir indiésemos  endir
SFX W   endir indiéramos  endir
SFX W   enir  iniésemos   enir
SFX W   enir  iniéramos   enir
SFX W   entir intiéramos  entir
SFX W   entir intiésemos  entir
SFX W   erir  iriéramos   erir
SFX W   erir  iriésemos   erir
SFX W   r     ésemos      ernir
SFX W   r     éramos      ernir
SFX W   ertir irtiéramos  ertir
SFX W   ertir irtiésemos  ertir
SFX W   ervir irviéramos  ervir
SFX W   ervir irviésemos  ervir
SFX W   estir istiéramos  estir
SFX W   estir istiésemos  estir
SFX W   r     ésemos      eunir
SFX W   r     éramos      eunir
SFX W   etir  itiéramos   etir
SFX W   etir  itiésemos   etir
SFX W   irir  iriéramos   irir
SFX W   irir  iriésemos   irir
SFX W   r     ésemos      ohibir
SFX W   r     éramos      ohibir
SFX W   ír    yéramos     oír
SFX W   ír    yésemos     oír
SFX W   orir  uriéramos   orir
SFX W   orir  uriésemos   orir
SFX W   ormir urmiéramos  ormir
SFX W   ormir urmiésemos  ormir
SFX W   cir   jéramos     ducir
SFX W   cir   jésemos     ducir
SFX W   r     éramos      [^d]ucir
SFX W   r     ésemos      [^d]ucir
SFX W   ir    yéramos     [^g]uir
SFX W   ir    yésemos     [^g]uir
SFX W   üir   uyésemos    güir
SFX W   üir   uyéramos    güir
